Nebraska, session 109, LB933.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB933 LB933
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-24,103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-24,103 Sections 71-24,103 to 71-24,105 and section 2 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act.
Sec. 2. A health care practitioner shall not be subject to arrest,
prosecution, or penalty, in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, a civil penalty or disciplinary action by
the Department of Health and Human Services or by any other occupational
or professional licensing board, solely for providing a written
recommendation or for stating that, in the health care practitioner's
professional opinion, a patient is likely to receive therapeutic or
palliative benefit from using cannabis to treat or alleviate a patient's
medical condition.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-24,103, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-2-